North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-03 Legislative Assembly

54-03-01.
State legislative apportionment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 463, § 4.

54-03-01.1.
Numbering legislative districts — Classes of senators to provide staggered terms. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 463, § 4.

54-03-01.2.
Legislative subdistricting — Methods. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 463, § 4.

54-03-01.3.
Election on petition — Ballot form — Vote required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 463, § 4.

54-03-01.4.
Amendment to the Constitution of the United States — Results. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 463, § 4.

54-03-01.5.
Legislative redistricting requirements.

A legislative redistricting plan based on any census taken after 1999 must meet the following requirements:

The senate must consist of forty-seven members and the house must consist of ninety-four members.

Except as provided in subsection 3, one senator and two representatives must be apportioned to each senatorial district. Representatives may be elected at large or from subdistricts.

Multimember senate districts providing for two senators and four representatives are authorized only when a proposed single-member senatorial district includes a federal facility or federal installation, containing over two-thirds of the population of the proposed single-member senatorial district.

Legislative districts and subdistricts must be compact and of contiguous territory.

Legislative districts must be as nearly equal in population as is practicable. Population deviation from district to district must be kept at a minimum. The total population variance of all districts, and subdistricts if created, from the average district population may not exceed recognized constitutional limitations.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 463, § 1; 1979, ch. 533, § 1; 1981, ch. 804, § 5; 1987, ch. 259, § 9; 1991, ch. 563, § 1; 2001 Sp., ch. 691, § 1.

Cross-References.

Emergency interim successors, authority for designation by legislators, see N.D. Const., Art. XI, § 7.

54-03-01.6.
State legislative apportionment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 804, § 9.

54-03-01.7.
State legislative apportionment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991 Sp., ch. 886, § 3.

54-03-01.8.
Staggering of the terms of senators. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011 Sp., ch. 582, § 3.

54-03-01.9.
Legislative redistricting. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 691, § 5.

54-03-01.10.
Staggering of terms of representatives. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011 Sp., ch. 582, § 3.

54-03-01.11.
Legislative redistricting. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 63, § 16.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 16 of chapter 63, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

54-03-01.12.
Legislative districts. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011 Sp., ch. 582, § 1; repealed by 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 563, § 3, effective November 12, 2021.

54-03-01.13.
Staggering of terms of members of the legislative assembly. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011 Sp., ch. 582, § 2; 2021, ch. 327, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; repealed by 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 563, § 3, effective November 12, 2021.